Georgia statutes. TITLE 45 Public Officers and Employees
Article 2 Death Investigations
45-16-49.
Fees.

The fees heretofore authorized to be paid in cases arising under this article prior to May 1, 1997, shall continue to be paid at the rate specified therein until such time as the Board of Public Safety promulgates rules prescribing such fees as provided by paragraph (5) of Code Section 35-3-151.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-16-49

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 128, § 45.

Editor’s notes.

This Code section as enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 128, § 45, is a codification of Ga. L. 1997, p. 1421, § 11(b).

45-16-50.
Providing biological substances to canine instructors or schools.

A medical examiner within the state of Georgia is authorized to provide to an approved canine instructor or school certain biological substances such as human blood or bodily fluids for the sole purpose of utilizing such substances for the training and handling of police canines in body recovery of human remains or rescue of persons. Such biological substances shall be contained and transported in accordance with appropriate health and safety standards.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-16-50

, enacted by Ga. L. 2009, p. 610, § 2/SB 38.

45-16-51.
Interment of unidentified human remains; disinterment for identification.

The chief medical examiner shall be authorized to inter unidentified human remains after the peace officer in charge has exhausted all efforts in identifying such remains.

Notwithstanding Code Section 45-16-45, the chief medical examiner shall have the authority to disinter remains interred pursuant to subsection (a) of this Code section when the chief medical examiner determines that further information can be obtained or further testing can be performed that may result in the identification of such remains.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-16-51

, enacted by Ga. L. 2018, p. 253, § 1/SB 385.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective July 1, 2018.

Cross references.

Cemetery and funeral services, T. 10, C. 14.

Disposition of dead bodies, T. 31, C. 21.

Permits for disposition, disinterment, and reinterment, §

31-10-20

.